Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2035
Annuity; adjustment; amount.

Any annuity paid pursuant to sections 81-2014 to 81-2034 to any officer or surviving spouse qualified to receive such payment shall be adjusted on May 27, 1989, to reflect changes in the cost of living and wage levels that have occurred subsequent to the date of retirement. The adjustment shall be an increase in an amount equal to three percent for each year since the date of such officer's retirement commencing on and after January 1, 1978, until December 31, 1984.

Laws 1989, LB 137, § 1.